Washington statutes.
RCW 36.01.130

Controls on rent for residential structures—Prohibited—Exceptions.

The imposition of controls on rent is of statewide significance and is preempted by the state. No county may enact, maintain or enforce ordinances or other provisions which regulate the amount of rent to be charged for single-family or multiple-unit residential rental structures or sites other than properties in public ownership, under public management, or properties providing low-income rental housing under joint public-private agreements for the financing or provision of such low-income rental housing. This section shall not be construed as prohibiting any county from entering into agreements with private persons which regulate or control the amount of rent to be charged for rental properties.

[ 1991 c 363 s 43; 1981 c 75 s 2.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.

Applicability to floating home moorage sites—Severability—1981 c 75: See notes following RCW 35.21.830.